apertium-eng.eng.dix
<pardef n="probj__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>you</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>thee</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>him</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>her</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>you</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>them</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>you</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>me</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>you</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>you</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>them</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>you</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>me</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>you</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>you</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>them</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>you</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="prdem__prn">
  <e>       <p><l><b/>this</l>  <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>these</l> <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>that</l>  <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>those</l> <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="prpos__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>mine</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>yours</l>     <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>his</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hers</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>its</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ours</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>yours</l>     <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>theirs</l>    <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yours</l>     <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>mine</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>yours</l>     <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ours</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>yours</l>     <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>theirs</l>    <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>yours</l>     <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>mine</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>yours</l>     <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ours</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>yours</l>     <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>theirs</l>    <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>yours</l>     <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="hello__ij">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="colo/ur__n">
  <e v="eng"><p><l>ur</l>       <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng"><p><l>ur</l>       <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng"><p><l>urs</l>      <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US"><p><l>r</l>     <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US"><p><l>r</l>     <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US"><p><l>rs</l>    <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="east__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/pants__n">
  <e>       <p><l>pants</l>     <r>pants<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>pants'</l>    <r>pants<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pairs<b/>of<b/>pants</l><r>pants<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>pairs<b/>of<b/>pants'</l><r>pants<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="personnel__n">
      <!-- same as politics__n -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="politics__n">
      <!--
	  Please, for -ICS nouns:
	  - use politics_n   if the noun is used with a verb in singular and plural
	  - use east_n       if the noun is used only with a verb in singular
	  - use personnel_n  if the noun is used only with a verb in plural
      -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Dutch__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="OK">              <i>OK</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
<e lm="a man's house is his castle"><i>a<b/>man's<b/>house<b/>is<b/>his<b/>castle</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
<e lm="bang">            <i>bang</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
<e lm="bye">             <i>bye</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="don't you"><i>don't<b/>you</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
<e lm="for God's sake">  <i>for<b/>God's<b/>sake</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
<e lm="gosh">            <i>gosh</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
<e lm="hey">             <i>hey</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
<e lm="never put off till tomorrow what you can do today"><i>never<b/>put<b/>off<b/>till<b/>tomorrow<b/>what<b/>you<b/>can<b/>do<b/>today</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
<e lm="say what">        <i>say<b/>what</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
<e lm="time is money">   <i>time<b/>is<b/>money</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
<e lm="whoa">            <i>whoa</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
<e lm="pants" c="(US)">  <i></i><par n="/pants__n"/></e>
<e lm="Cantonese">       <i>Cantonese</i><par n="Dutch__n"/></e>
<e lm="Cornish">         <i>Cornish</i><par n="Dutch__n"/></e>
<e lm="Sinhalese">       <i>Sinhalese</i><par n="Dutch__n"/></e>
<e lm="accused">         <i>accused</i><par n="Dutch__n"/></e>
<e lm="agronomics">      <i>agronomics</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="Danish">          <par n="Dd"/><i>anish</i><par n="Dutch__n"/></e>
<e lm="aurochs">         <i>aurochs</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="basic resuscitation"><i>basic<b/>resuscitation</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="bed-socks">       <i>bed-socks</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="biophysics" a="greenbreen"><i>biophysics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="chaos">           <i>chaos</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="Schilcher">       <par n="Ss"/><i>chilcher</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="crisps">          <i>crisps</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="data">            <i>data</i><par n="Dutch__n"/></e>
<e lm="daughter-in-law"> <i>daughter-in-law</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="detritus">        <i>detritus</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="dirty clothes">   <i>dirty<b/>clothes</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="electrogravimetry"><i>electrogravimetry</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="ethnolinguistics"><i>ethnolinguistics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="fine arts">       <i>fine<b/>arts</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="freelance work">  <i>freelance<b/>work</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="fumes">           <i>fumes</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="gnomonics">       <i>gnomonics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="graphics">        <i>graphics</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="homeware">        <i>homeware</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="isinglass">       <i>isinglass</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="landing craft">   <i>landing<b/>craft</i><par n="Dutch__n"/></e>
<e lm="lazybones">       <i>lazybones</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="measles">         <i>measles</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="meninges">        <i>meninges</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="metadata">        <i>metadata</i><par n="Dutch__n"/></e>
<e lm="neuropsychology"> <i>neuropsychology</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="odds">            <i>odds</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="Spanish">         <par n="Ss"/><i>panish</i><par n="Dutch__n"/></e>
<e lm="phenetics" a="greenbreen"><i>phenetics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="pyjamas" v="eng"> <i>pyjamas</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="ramadan">         <i>ramadan</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="rhinoceros">      <i>rhinoceros</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="roe">             <i>roe</i><par n="Dutch__n"/></e>
<e lm="rumour" c="(GB)"> <i>rumo</i><par n="colo/ur__n"/></e>
<e lm="suds">            <i>suds</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="surfeit">         <i>surfeit</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="surroundings">    <i>surroundings</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="underpants">      <i>under</i><par n="/pants__n"/></e>
<e lm="undersigned">     <p><l>undersigned</l><r>undersigned</r></p><par n="Dutch__n"/></e>
<e lm="vapour">          <i>vapo</i><par n="colo/ur__n"/></e>
<e lm="entrails">  <i>entrails</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="pronoms personals d'objecte"><i></i><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="possessive pronoun"><i></i><par n="prpos__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="prdem__prn"><i></i><par n="prdem__prn"/></e>
